California statutes. Corporations Code
(e) Upon a reasonable written request, the person possessing the power to vote shares of stock on behalf of another, or a designated agent, shall disclose the voting record with respect to any matter involving a specific security or securities in accordance with the following procedures:

(1) Except as set forth in paragraph (2), disclosure shall be made to the person making the request. The person making the disclosure may require identification sufficient to identify the person making the request as a person on whose behalf the shares were voted. A request for identification, if made, shall be reasonable, shall
 be made promptly, and may include a request for the person’s social security number.

(2) If the person possessing the power to vote shares on behalf of another holds that power pursuant to an agreement entered into with a party other than the person making the request for disclosure, the person maintaining and disclosing the record pursuant to this section may, instead, make the requested disclosure to that party. Disclosure to that party shall be deemed compliance with the disclosure requirement of this section. If disclosure is made to that party and not to the person making the request, subdivision (i) shall not apply. However, nothing herein shall prohibit that party and the person possessing the power to vote on shares from entering into an agreement between themselves for the payment or assessment of a reasonable charge to defray expenses of disclosing the record.

(f) Where
 the entity subject to the requirements of this section is organized as a unit investment trust as defined in Section 4(2) of the federal Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80a-1 et seq.), the open-ended investment companies underlying the unit investment trust shall promptly make available their proxy voting records to the unit investment trust upon evidence of a bona fide request for voting record information pursuant to subdivision (e).

(g) Signing a proxy on another’s behalf and forwarding it for disposition or receiving voting instructions does not constitute the power to vote. A person forwarding proxies or receiving voting instructions shall disclose the identity of the person having the power to vote shares upon reasonable written request by a person entitled to request a voting record under subdivision (c).

(h) For purposes of this section, if one or more
 persons has the power to vote shares on behalf of another, unless a governing instrument provides otherwise, the person or persons may designate an agent who shall maintain and disclose the record in accordance with subdivisions (b) and (c).

(i) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), or as otherwise provided by law or a governing instrument, a person maintaining and disclosing a record pursuant to this section may assess a reasonable charge to the requesting person in order to defray expenses of disclosing the record in accordance with subdivision (e). Disclosure shall be made within a reasonable period after payment is received.

(j) Upon the petition of any person who successfully brings an action pursuant to or to enforce this section, the court may award costs and reasonable attorney’s fees if the court finds that the defendant willfully violated this section.
 

(k) The obligation to maintain and disclose a voting record in accordance with subdivisions (b) and (c) shall commence January 1, 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1360, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Shareholder Derivative Actions [800. - 800.]

800.

(a) As used in this section, “corporation” includes an unincorporated association; “board” includes the managing body of an unincorporated association; “shareholder” includes a member of an unincorporated association; and “shares” includes memberships in an unincorporated association.

(b) No action may be instituted or maintained in right of any domestic or foreign corporation by any holder of shares or of voting trust certificates of the corporation unless both of the following conditions exist:

(1) The
 plaintiff alleges in the complaint that plaintiff was a shareholder, of record or beneficially, or the holder of voting trust certificates at the time of the transaction or any part thereof of which plaintiff complains or that plaintiff’s shares or voting trust certificates thereafter devolved upon plaintiff by operation of law from a holder who was a holder at the time of the transaction or any part thereof complained of; provided, that any shareholder who does not meet these requirements may nevertheless be allowed in the discretion of the court to maintain the action on a preliminary showing to and determination by the court, by motion and after a hearing, at which the court shall consider such evidence, by affidavit or testimony, as it deems material, that (i) there is a strong prima facie case in favor of the claim asserted on behalf of the corporation, (ii) no other similar action has been or is likely to be instituted, (iii) the
 plaintiff acquired the shares before there was disclosure to the public or to the plaintiff of the wrongdoing of which plaintiff complains, (iv) unless the action can be maintained the defendant may retain a gain derived from defendant’s willful breach of a fiduciary duty, and (v) the requested relief will not result in unjust enrichment of the corporation or any shareholder of the corporation; and

(2) The plaintiff alleges in the complaint with particularity plaintiff’s efforts to secure from the board such action as plaintiff desires, or the reasons for not making such effort, and alleges further that plaintiff has either informed the corporation or the board in writing of the ultimate facts of each cause of action against each defendant or delivered to the corporation or the board a true copy of the complaint which plaintiff proposes to file.

(c) In any action referred to in subdivision (b), at any time within 30 days after service of summons upon the corporation or upon any defendant who is an officer or director of the corporation, or held such office at the time of the acts complained of, the corporation or the defendant may move the court for an order, upon notice and hearing, requiring the plaintiff to furnish a bond as hereinafter provided. The motion shall be based upon one or both of the following grounds:

(1) That there is no reasonable possibility that the prosecution of the cause of action alleged in the complaint against the moving party will benefit the corporation or its shareholders.

(2) That the moving party, if other than the corporation, did not participate in the transaction complained of in any capacity.

The court on application of the
 corporation or any defendant may, for good cause shown, extend the 30-day period for an additional period or periods not exceeding 60 days.

(d) At the hearing upon any motion pursuant to subdivision (c), the court shall consider such evidence, written or oral, by witnesses or affidavit, as may be material (1) to the ground or grounds upon which the motion is based, or (2) to a determination of the probable reasonable expenses, including attorneys’ fees, of the corporation and the moving party which will be incurred in the defense of the action. If the court determines, after hearing the evidence adduced by the parties, that the moving party has established a probability in support of any of the grounds upon which the motion is based, the court shall fix the amount of the bond, not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), to be furnished by the plaintiff for reasonable expenses, including attorneys’
 fees, which may be incurred by the moving party and the corporation in connection with the action, including expenses for which the corporation may become liable pursuant to Section 317. A ruling by the court on the motion shall not be a determination of any issue in the action or of the merits thereof. If the court, upon the motion, makes a determination that a bond shall be furnished by the plaintiff as to any one or more defendants, the action shall be dismissed as to the defendant or defendants, unless the bond required by the court has been furnished within such reasonable time as may be fixed by the court.

(e) If the plaintiff shall, either before or after a motion is made pursuant to subdivision (c), or any order or determination pursuant to the motion, furnish a bond in the aggregate amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to secure the reasonable expenses of the parties entitled to make the motion, the plaintiff has complied with
 the requirements of this section and with any order for a bond theretofore made, and any such motion then pending shall be dismissed and no further or additional bond shall be required.

(f) If a motion is filed pursuant to subdivision (c), no pleadings need be filed by the corporation or any other defendant and the prosecution of the action shall be stayed until 10 days after the motion has been disposed of.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 186.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Amendment of Articles [900. - 911.]

900.

(a) By complying with the provisions of this chapter, a corporation may amend its articles from time to time, in any and as many respects as may be desired, so long as its articles as amended contain only such provisions as it would be lawful to insert in original articles filed at the time of the filing of the amendment and, if a change in shares or the rights of shareholders or an exchange,
 reclassification or cancellation of shares or rights of shareholders is to be made, such provisions as may be necessary to effect such change, exchange, reclassification or cancellation. It is the intent of the Legislature in adopting this section to exercise to the fullest extent the reserve power of the state over corporations and to authorize any amendment of the articles covered by the preceding sentence regardless of whether any provision contained in the amendment was permissible at the time of the original incorporation of the corporation.

(b) A corporation shall not amend its articles to add any statement or to alter any statement that may appear in the original articles of the initial street address and initial mailing address of the corporation, the names and addresses of the first directors, or the name and address of the initial agent, except to correct an error in the statement or to delete the information after the corporation has
 filed a statement under Section 1502.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 494, Sec. 5.   (SB 1532)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

901.

Before any shares have been issued, any amendment of the articles may be adopted by a writing signed by a majority of the incorporators, if directors were not named in the original articles and have not been elected, or, if directors were named in the original articles or have been elected, by a majority of the directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

902.

(a) After any shares have been issued, amendments may be adopted if approved by the board and approved by the outstanding shares (Section 152), either before or after the approval by the board.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an amendment extending the corporate existence or making the corporate existence perpetual may be adopted by a
 corporation organized prior to August 14, 1929, with approval by the board alone.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), unless the corporation has more than one class of shares outstanding, an amendment effecting only a stock split (including an increase in the authorized number of shares in proportion thereto) may be adopted with approval by the board alone.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an amendment deleting the initial street address and initial mailing address of the corporation, the names and addresses of the first directors, or the name and address of the initial agent may be adopted with approval by the board alone.

(e) Whenever the articles require for corporate action the vote of a larger proportion or of all of the shares of any class or series, or of a larger proportion or of all of the directors,
 than is otherwise required by this division, the provision in the articles requiring such greater vote shall not be altered, amended or repealed except by such greater vote unless otherwise provided in the articles.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any amendment reducing the vote required for an amendment pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 158 may not be adopted unless approved by the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of each class of outstanding shares or such other vote as may then be specified by the articles of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 494, Sec. 6.   (SB 1532)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

903.

(a) A proposed amendment must be approved by the outstanding shares (Section 152) of a class, whether or not such class is entitled to vote thereon by the provisions of the articles, if the amendment would:

(1) Increase or decrease the aggregate number of authorized shares of such class, other than an increase as provided in either subdivision (b) of Section 405 or subdivision (c) of Section 902.

(2) Effect an
 exchange, reclassification, or cancellation of all or part of the shares of such class, including a reverse stock split but excluding a stock split.

(3) Effect an exchange, or create a right of exchange, of all or part of the shares of another class into the shares of such class.

(4) Change the rights, preferences, privileges or restrictions of the shares of such class.

(5) Create a new class of shares having rights, preferences or privileges prior to the shares of such class, or increase the rights, preferences or privileges or the number of authorized shares of any class having rights, preferences or privileges prior to the shares of such class.

(6) In the case of preferred shares, divide the shares of any class into series having different rights,
 preferences, privileges or restrictions or authorize the board to do so.

(7) Cancel or otherwise affect dividends on the shares of such class which have accrued but have not been paid.

(b) Different series of the same class shall not constitute different classes for the purpose of voting by classes except when a series is adversely affected by an amendment in a different manner than other shares of the same class.

(c) In addition to approval by a class as provided in subdivision (a), a proposed amendment must also be approved by the outstanding voting shares (Section 152).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 136, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

904.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), if any amendment of the articles would make shares assessable or would authorize remedy by action for the collection of an assessment on fully paid shares, it shall be approved by all of the outstanding shares affected regardless of limitations or restrictions on the voting rights thereof.

(b) If a corporation is a mutual water company within the meaning of Section 2705 of the Public Utilities Code, an amendment of the articles to make the shares assessable or to amend prior article provisions authorizing assessment of shares
 shall be approved by the holders of at least two-thirds of the outstanding shares of any class affected by the amendment regardless of limitations or restrictions on the voting rights thereof. However, if the amendment would authorize remedy by action for the collection of an assessment on fully paid shares, the amendment shall be approved pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 677, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

905.

In the case of amendments adopted after the corporation has issued any shares, the corporation shall file a certificate of amendment, which shall consist of an officers’ certificate stating:

(a) The wording of the amendment or amended articles in accordance with Section 907;

(b) That the amendment has been approved by the board;

(c) If the amendment is one for which the approval of the outstanding shares (Section 152) is required, that the amendment was approved by the required vote
 of shareholders in accordance with Section 902, 903 or 904; the total number of outstanding shares of each class entitled to vote with respect to the amendment; and that the number of shares of each class voting in favor of the amendment equaled or exceeded the vote required, specifying the percentage vote required of each class entitled to vote; and

(d) If the amendment is one which may be adopted with approval by the board alone, a statement of the facts entitling the board alone to adopt the amendment. 

In the event of an amendment of the articles pursuant to a merger, the filing of the officers’ certificate and agreement pursuant to Section 1103 or a certificate of ownership pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1110 shall be in lieu of any filing required under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

906.

In the case of amendments adopted by the incorporators or the board under Section 901, the corporation shall file a certificate of amendment signed and verified by a majority of the incorporators or of the board, as the case may be, which shall state that the signers thereof constitute at least a majority of the incorporators or of the board, that the corporation has issued no shares and that they adopt the amendment or amendments therein set forth. In the case of amendments adopted by the incorporators, the certificate shall also state that directors were not named in the original articles and have not been elected.

In the case of
 amendments adopted by the board under Section 901, the corporation may file a certificate of amendment pursuant to Section 905 in lieu of a certificate of amendment pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

907.

(a) The certificate of amendment shall establish the wording of the amendment or amended articles by one or more of the following means:

(1) By stating that the articles shall be amended to read as therein set forth in full.

(2) By stating that any provision of the articles, which shall be identified by the numerical or other designation given it in the articles or by stating the wording thereof, shall be stricken from the articles or shall be amended to read as set forth in the certificate.

(3) By stating that the provisions set forth therein shall be added to the articles.

(b) If the purpose of the amendment is to effect a stock split or reverse stock split or to reclassify, cancel, exchange, or otherwise change outstanding shares, the amended articles shall state the effect thereof on outstanding shares. 

(c) In the event of an amendment to change the statement of authorized shares from a single class of shares to two classes, the shares outstanding immediately prior to the amendment are automatically considered to be the same number of shares of the common stock class. If the designation of only one of the two classes includes “common,” that class is the common stock class. If the designation of both classes or of neither class includes “common” but one of the two classes has limited or no voting
 rights, the class whose voting rights are not limited is the common stock class for the purpose of this subdivision. This subdivision has no application if the amendment of articles includes a statement of the effect of the amendment on outstanding shares pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) An amendment which adds or eliminates a stated par value or changes the stated par value and which does not also state the effect of the amendment on outstanding shares is not thereby subject to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 764, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

908.

Upon the filing of the certificate of amendment, the articles shall be amended in accordance with the certificate and any stock split, reverse stock split, reclassification, cancellation, exchange or other change in shares shall be effected, and a copy of the certificate, certified by the Secretary of State, is prima facie evidence of the performance of the conditions necessary to the adoption of the amendment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

909.

A corporation formed for a limited period may at any time subsequent to the expiration of the term of its corporate existence, if it has continuously acted as a corporation and done business as such, extend the term of its existence by an amendment to its articles removing any provision limiting the term of its existence and providing for perpetual existence. If the filing of the certificate of amendment providing for perpetual existence would be prohibited if it were original articles by the provisions of Section 201, the Secretary of State shall not file such certificate unless by the same or a concurrently filed certificate of amendment the articles of such corporation are
 amended to adopt a new available name. For the purpose of the adoption of any such amendment, persons who have been functioning as directors of such corporation shall be considered to have been validly elected even though their election may have occurred after the expiration of the original term of the corporate existence. The certificate of amendment shall set forth that the corporation continuously acted as a corporation and did business as such from the expiration of its term of corporate existence to the date of the amendment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

910.

(a) A corporation may restate in a single certificate the entire text of its articles as amended by filing an officers’ certificate or, in circumstances where incorporators or the board may amend a corporation’s articles pursuant to Sections 901 and 906, a certificate signed and verified by a majority of the incorporators or the board, as applicable, entitled Restated Articles of Incorporation, which shall set forth the articles as amended to the date of the filing of the certificate, except that the signatures and acknowledgments of the articles by the incorporators and any statements regarding the effect of any prior amendment upon outstanding shares and any provisions of agreements of merger (other than amendments to the articles of the surviving
 corporation) and the initial street address and initial mailing address of the corporation and the names and addresses of the first directors and of the initial agent for service of process shall be omitted (except that the initial street address and initial mailing address of the corporation, the names and addresses of the initial agent for service of process and, if previously set forth in the articles, the initial directors, shall not be omitted before the time that the corporation has filed a statement under Section 1502). Such omissions are not alterations or amendments of the articles. The certificate may also itself alter or amend the articles in any respect, in which case the certificate must comply with Section 905 or 906, as the case may be, and Section 907.

(b) If the certificate does not itself alter or amend the articles in
 any respect, it shall be approved by the board or, before the issuance of any shares and the naming and election of directors, by a majority of the incorporators, and shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter relating to an amendment of the articles not requiring any approval of the outstanding shares (Section 152). If the certificate does itself alter or amend the articles, it shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter relating to the amendment or amendments so made and, except for certificates approved by a majority of the incorporators, the certificate shall also state that the board has approved the restated articles.

(c) Certificates of determination are a part of the articles within the meaning of this section. The provisions of such a certificate shall be given an article designation in the restated articles.

(d) Restated articles of incorporation filed pursuant to this section shall supersede for all purposes the original articles and all amendments and certificates of determination filed prior thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 18.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

911.

(a) A corporation may, by amendment of its articles pursuant to this section, change its status to that of a social purpose corporation, nonprofit public benefit corporation, nonprofit mutual benefit corporation, nonprofit religious corporation, or cooperative corporation.

(b) The amendment of the articles to change status to a nonprofit corporation shall revise the statement of purpose, delete the authorization for shares and any other provisions relating to authorized or issued shares, make such other changes as may be necessary or desired, and, if any shares have been issued, provide either for the cancellation of those shares or for the conversion of those shares to memberships of
 the nonprofit corporation. The amendment of the articles to change status to a cooperative corporation shall revise the statement of purpose, make such other changes as may be necessary or desired, and, if any shares have been issued, provide for the cancellation of those shares or for the conversion of those shares to memberships of the cooperative corporation, if necessary.

(c) If shares have been issued, an amendment to change status to a nonprofit corporation shall be approved by all of the outstanding shares of all classes regardless of limitations or restrictions on the voting rights thereof and an amendment to change status to a cooperative corporation shall be approved by the outstanding shares (Section 152) of each class regardless of limitations or restrictions on the voting rights thereof.

(d) In the case of a change of status to a social purpose corporation:

(1) The corporation shall modify the name of the corporation, revise the statement of purpose, include the statement required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 2602, and make such other conforming changes as may be necessary or desired.

(2) The amendment shall be approved by the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of each class, or a greater vote if required in the articles, of outstanding shares (Section 152) of that changing corporation.

(e) If an amendment pursuant to this section is included in a merger agreement, the provisions of this section apply, except that any provision for cancellation or conversion of shares shall be in the merger agreement rather than in the amendment of the articles.

(f) Notwithstanding
 subdivision (c), if a corporation is a mutual water company within the meaning of Section 2705 of the Public Utilities Code and under the terms of the status change each outstanding share is converted to a membership of a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation, an amendment to change status to a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation shall be approved by the outstanding shares (Section 152) of each class regardless of limitations or restrictions on the voting rights thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 4.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Sales of Assets [1000. - 1002.]

1000.

Any mortgage, deed of trust, pledge or other hypothecation of all or any part of the corporation’s property, real or personal, for the purpose of securing the payment or performance of any contract or obligation may be approved by the board. Unless the articles otherwise provide, no approval of shareholders (Section 153) or of the outstanding shares (Section 152) shall be necessary for such action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.

(a) A corporation may sell, lease, convey, exchange, transfer, or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its assets when the principal terms are approved by the board, and, unless the transaction is in the usual and regular course of its business, approved by the outstanding shares (Section 152), either before or after approval by the board and before or after the transaction. A transaction constituting a reorganization (Section 181) is subject to the provisions of Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1200) and not this section (other than subdivision (d)). A transaction constituting a conversion (Section 161.9) is subject to the provisions of Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 1150) and not this section.

(b) Notwithstanding approval of the outstanding shares (Section 152), the board may abandon the proposed transaction without further action by the shareholders, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties.

(c) The sale, lease, conveyance, exchange, transfer, or other disposition may be made upon those terms and conditions and for that consideration as the board may deem in the best interests of the corporation. The consideration may be money, securities, or other property.

(d) If the acquiring party in a transaction pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section or subdivision (g) of Section 2001 is in control of or under common control with the disposing corporation, the principal terms of the sale must
 be approved by at least 90 percent of the voting power of the disposing corporation unless the disposition is to a domestic or foreign corporation or other business entity in consideration of the nonredeemable common shares or nonredeemable equity securities of the acquiring party or its parent.

(e) Subdivision (d) does not apply to any transaction if the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, the Insurance Commissioner, or the Public Utilities Commission has approved the terms and conditions of the transaction and the fairness of those terms and conditions pursuant to Section 25142 of this code, or Section 1209, 5750, or 5802 of the Financial Code, Section 838.5 of the Insurance Code, or Section 822 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 19.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.

Any deed or instrument conveying or otherwise transferring any assets of a corporation may have annexed to it the certificate of the secretary or an assistant secretary of the corporation, setting forth that the transaction has been validly approved by the board and (a) stating that the property described in said deed or instrument is less than substantially all of the assets of the corporation or that the transfer is in the usual and regular course of the business of the corporation, if such be the case, or (b) if such property constitutes all or substantially all of the assets of the corporation and the transfer is not in the usual and regular course of the business of the
 corporation, stating the fact of approval thereof by the outstanding shares (Section 152) pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 12, as the case may be, or that such approval is not required by Chapter 12. Such certificate is prima facie evidence of the existence of the facts authorizing such conveyance or other transfer of the assets and conclusive evidence in favor of any innocent purchaser or encumbrancer for value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Merger [1100. - 1113.]

1100.

Any two or more corporations may be merged into one of those corporations. A corporation may merge with one or more domestic corporations (Section 167), social purpose corporations (Section 171.08), foreign corporations (Section 171), or other business entities (Section 174.5) pursuant to this chapter. Mergers in which a foreign corporation but no other business entity is a constituent party are governed by Section 1108, mergers in which a social purpose corporation but no other business entity is a constituent party are governed by Section 1112.5, and mergers in which an other business entity is a constituent party are governed by Section 1113.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 5.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1101.

(a) The board of each corporation that desires to merge shall approve an agreement of merger. The constituent corporations shall be parties to the agreement of merger and other persons, including a parent party (Section 1200), may be parties to the agreement of merger. The agreement shall state all of the following:

(1) The terms and conditions of the merger.

(2) The amendments, subject to Sections 900 and 907, to the articles of the surviving corporation to be effected by the merger, if any. If any amendment changes the name of the surviving corporation the new name may be the same as or
 similar to the name of a disappearing domestic or foreign corporation, subject to subdivision (b) of Section 201.

(3) The name and place of incorporation of each constituent corporation and which of the constituent corporations is the surviving corporation.

(4) The manner of converting the shares of each of the constituent corporations into shares or other securities of the surviving corporation and, if any shares of any of the constituent corporations are not to be converted solely into shares or other securities of the surviving corporation, the cash, rights, securities, or other property which the holders of those shares are to receive in exchange for the shares, which cash, rights, securities, or other property may be in addition to or in lieu of shares or other securities of
 the surviving corporation, or that the shares are canceled without consideration.

(5) Other details or provisions as are desired, if any, including, without limitation, a provision for the payment of cash in lieu of fractional shares or for any other arrangement with respect thereto consistent with the provisions of Section 407.

(b) Each share of the same class or series of any constituent corporation (other than the cancellation of shares held by a constituent corporation or its parent or a wholly owned subsidiary of either in another constituent corporation) shall, unless all shareholders of the class or series consent and except as provided in Section 407, be treated equally with respect to any distribution of cash, rights, securities, or other property. Notwithstanding paragraph
 (4) of subdivision (a), except in a short-form merger, and in the merger of a corporation into its subsidiary in which it owns at least 90 percent of the outstanding shares of each class, the nonredeemable common shares or nonredeemable equity securities of a constituent corporation may be converted only into nonredeemable common shares of the surviving party or a parent party if a constituent corporation or its parent owns, directly or indirectly, before the merger shares of another constituent corporation representing more than 50 percent of the voting power of the other constituent corporation before the merger, unless all of the shareholders of the class consent and except as provided in Section 407.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 20.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1101.1.

Subdivision (c) of Section 1113 and subdivision (b) of Section 1101 do not apply to any transaction if the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, the Insurance Commissioner, or the Public Utilities Commission has approved the terms and conditions of the transaction and the fairness of those terms and conditions pursuant to Section 25142 or Section 1209, 5750, or 5802 of the Financial Code, Section 838.5 of the Insurance Code, or Section 822 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 21.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.

Each corporation shall sign the agreement by its chairperson of the board, president or a vice president and secretary or an assistant secretary acting on behalf of their respective corporations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 98, Sec. 9.   (SB 351)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.

After approval of a merger by the board and any approval of the outstanding shares (Section 152) required by Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1200), the surviving corporation shall file a copy of the agreement of merger with an officers’ certificate of each constituent corporation attached stating the total number of outstanding shares of each class entitled to vote on the merger, that the principal terms of the agreement in the form attached were approved by that corporation by a vote of a number of shares of each class which equaled or exceeded the vote
 required, specifying each class entitled to vote and the percentage vote required of each class, or that the merger agreement was entitled to be and was approved by the board alone under the provisions of Section 1201. If equity securities of a parent of a constituent corporation are to be issued in the merger, the officers’ certificate of that constituent corporation shall state either that no vote of the shareholders of the parent was required or that the required vote was obtained. The merger and any amendment of the articles of the surviving corporation contained in the merger agreement shall thereupon be effective (subject to subdivision (c) of Section 110 and subject to the provisions of Section 1108) and the several parties thereto shall be one corporation. The Secretary of State may certify a copy of the merger agreement separate from the officers’ certificates attached thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1104.

Any amendment to the agreement may be adopted and the agreement so amended may be approved by the board and, if it changes any of the principal terms of the agreement, by the outstanding shares (Section 152) (if required by Chapter 12) of any constituent corporation in the same manner as the original agreement. If the agreement so amended is approved by the board and the outstanding shares (if required) of each of the corporations, the agreement so amended shall then constitute the agreement of merger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

1105.

The board may, in its discretion, abandon a merger, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties, including other constituent corporations, without further approval by the outstanding shares (Section 152), at any time before the merger is effective.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1106.

A copy of an agreement of merger certified on or after the effective date by an official having custody thereof has the same force in evidence as the original and, except as against the state, is conclusive evidence of the performance of all conditions precedent to the merger, the existence on the effective date of the surviving corporation and the performance of the conditions necessary to the adoption of any amendment to the articles contained in the agreement of merger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

1107.
